Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3606
Rural Development Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Rural Development Cash Fund which shall be used by the Rural Development Commission for the purposes of sections 81-3601 to 81-3605. Money credited to the fund shall include any monetary gifts, grants, and donations, proceeds from contracts for services, and reimbursements of expenses. Any grant funds under the National Rural Development Partnership received by the State of Nebraska from the United States Department of Agriculture shall be allocated to the commission. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1993, LB 190, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 109;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 81-1287;

Laws 1998, LB 1053, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 48, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 48, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.